Hawaii, session 2025, SB1621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that requiring nail technicians to obtain a cosmetology license requires nail technicians to learn skills irrelevant to their profession.    Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to exempt nail technicians from licensing requirements. SECTION 2.  Section 439A-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending the definition of "beauty operator" to read: ""Beauty operator" means one of the following license categories: cosmetologist, hairdresser, or esthetician[, or nail technician]." 2.  By amending the definition of "cosmetologist" to read: ""Cosmetologist" means a licensed person who engages in the practices of a hairdresser[,] or esthetician[, and nail technician for compensation]." 3.  By deleting the definition of "nail technician". [""Nail technician" means a person licensed in the State who engages for compensation in any of the following practices: (1)  Cutting, trimming, polishing, coloring, cleansing, or otherwise treating a person's fingernails and toenails; (2)  Applying artificial fingernails and toenails; and (3)  Massaging and cleansing a person's hands, arms, legs, and feet."] SECTION 3.  Section 439A-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§439A-6[]]  Applications; requisites for admission to examination.  (a)  Each person who desires to practice as a barber apprentice, beauty apprentice, barber, beauty operator, or beauty instructor shall: (1)  Be at least sixteen years of age; (2)  File with the board a written application on a form prescribed by the board; (3)  Deposit with the board the required fees; and (4)  Possess the qualifications specified in this section. (b)  A barber apprentice or beauty apprentice applicant shall provide proof that the applicant will be training in a barber shop or beauty shop under the supervision of a barber or beauty operator. (c)  A barber applicant shall have an education equivalent to the completion of high school and either: (1)  Three thousand hours of training as a barber apprentice in a barber shop or beauty shop under the supervision of a barber, cosmetologist, or hairdresser; or (2)  One thousand five hundred hours of training in a barber school. (d)  A cosmetologist applicant shall have an education equivalent to the completion of high school and either: (1)  Three thousand six hundred hours of training as a beauty apprentice in a beauty shop under the supervision of a cosmetologist or in a barber shop under the supervision of a barber for the hairdresser training only; or (2)  One thousand eight hundred hours of training in a beauty school. (e)  A hairdresser applicant shall have an education equivalent to the completion of high school and either: (1)  Two thousand five hundred hours of training as a beauty apprentice in a beauty shop or barber shop under the supervision of a cosmetologist, hairdresser, or barber for the hairdresser training; or (2)  One thousand two hundred fifty hours of training in a beauty school. (f)  An esthetician applicant shall have an education equivalent to the completion of high school and either: (1)  One thousand two hundred hours of training as a beauty apprentice in a beauty shop or barber shop under the supervision of a cosmetologist or esthetician; or (2)  Six hundred hours of training in a beauty school. [(g)  A nail technician applicant shall have an education equivalent to the completion of high school and either: (1)  Seven hundred hours of training as a beauty apprentice in a beauty shop or barber shop under the supervision of a cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician; or (2)  Three hundred fifty hours of training in a beauty school. (h)] (g)  A beauty instructor applicant may apply to teach in any of the practices of cosmetology if the applicant has: (1)  Completed six hundred hours of a board approved course in the theory and practice of instruction; and (2)  Served actively for a period of at least one year as a beauty operator in the State or in another jurisdiction having standards for beauty operators substantially equivalent to those of the State. [(i)] (h)  The board shall recognize barber and beauty training obtained in another jurisdiction that is substantially equivalent to the training in the State.  If the training is not equivalent, the board shall make a determination as to whether to recognize the training by evaluating the type and duration of the training and the experience required to obtain a license in the other jurisdiction." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.